dictsource/pt_rules
.group x
        x (A       S
     A) x (A       ks
     e) x (A       ks
    _e) x (A       z
    _ê) x (A       z
?1   e) x (CA      S
    ai) x (A       S
    ei) x (A       S
   _au) x          s
    ou) x (+       S
     u) x (i       S
        x (iqu     S
        x (C       s#
     A) xc (Y      s
?1   A) xc (Y      Ss        // exceção, excesso
        x (s 
     A) x (_       ks
        x (AxA     S
     A) x (ó_      S         // riquexó, pataxó
     a) x (a       S
     a) x (á       S
     a) x (ar      S
     a) x (ei      S
    xA) x (A       S
_abaca) x (i       S
   ale) x (a       S
  _ave) x (A       S
   bau) x (A       S
   brA) x (A       S
   _bu) x (o_      S
    bY) x (A       S
   _ca) x (A       S
   _co) x (A       S
  _coe) x (A       z
 _debu) x (A       S
  _eli) x (ir      S
 _enro) x (A       S
_esdrA) x (ul      S
    _e) x (u_      S
     e) x (amY     z
   _fa) x (i       S
  _fle) x (a       S
   gra) x (A       S
   _he) x (A       z
?2 _he) x (A       ks
  _ine) x (A       z
  _ine) x (orAC    ks
_lagarti) x (A     S
   _li) x (A       S
   _lu) x (A       S
    má) x (im      s         // máximo, máximas, etc.
    me) x (A       S
   _mé) x (i       S
    mo) x (a       S
    _o) x (A       S
    _o) x (i       ks
    _o) x (í       ks
   _pe) xo (to_    So
    pi) x (A       S
    pi) x (el      ks
 _pree) x (ist     z
  _pro) x (A       S
  _pra) x (A       S
   prA) x (i       s         // aproximado, aproximar, próximo, etc.
    pu) x (A       S         // verb "puxar" and all its conjugations
   qui) x (A       S
    ri) x (A       S
  rela) x (A       S
   _ro) x (A       S
 tarra) x (A       S
   _ta) x (e       S
   _te) x (ugo_    S
 _trou) x (e       s
   _ve) x (A       S
   _xi) x (A       S
?1   i) x (a_      S
?1   i) x (as_     S
 _trou) x (ér      s
  _pro) x (imA     s

    // in compound words like 'C-Word'
     _) x (B+      S,is#     // XBox

    // in acronyms like 'A.B.C.'
    _A) x (C_      S,is#
   _AH) x (_       S'is#
    // in acronyms like 'C.B.A.'
     _) x (BA_     S,is#
    _C) x (A_      S,is#


.group y
        y          i
        y (A       j
        y (_       %i        // ?? stress on 1st syllable  EN

?2      yl (_      iU
?2      yl (B      iU
?2      yl (_A     iw
?2      yl (_hA    iw

        ym (_      i~N
        ym (b      i~N
        ym (p      i~N
        yn (K      i~N

?4      ym (_      i~
?4      ym (b      i~
?4      ym (p      i~
?4      yn (K      i~

    // in acronyms like 'A.B.C.'
?1   _) y (HC_     ,ips,ilON
?2   _) y (HC_     ,ipsilo~N
    // in acronyms like 'C.B.A.'
?1 _CB) y (_       'ips,ilON
?2 _CB) y (_       'ipsilo~N


.group z
        z          z
        z (z+ 

?4      z (B       s

     @) z (K       s#
     @) z (_h      z
     @) z (_A      z
     @) z (_G      z

?1   A) z (C       S
?1   A) z (G+      Z
?1   A) z (_h      z
?1   A) z (_C      S
?1   A) z (_G+     Z

        zr         zx
   _pi) zz (a      t|s

    @!) zzi (_     =zi       // Italian immigrants

    // in compound words like 'C-Word'
     _) z (B+      z,e       // ZCat
     _) z (GA+     z         // Zverev, Zmeiny, Zgorzelec etc
     _) z (sA+     z         // Zsolt, Zsófia, Zsuzsanna etc

    // in acronyms like 'A.B.C.'
    _A) z (C_      z,e
   _AH) z (_       z'e
    // in acronyms like 'C.B.A.'
     _) z (BA_     z,e
    _C) z (A_      z,e


.group
        ç          s
        ß          s

        ä          a
        ë          e
        ö          o
        ï          i
        ü          u

    D_) º          %o        // ordinal
    D_) ª          %a        // ordinal

        , (D       v'irgul&

    __) - (_D      m'enUs#
    D_) - (_D      m'enUs#
    A_) - (_D      _
    C_) - (_D      _
